Utah statutes.
63J-4-504.   Duties.

(1)  The committee shall assist the state planning coordinator:

(a)  in the review of:

(i)  proposed state actions affecting physical resources;

(ii)  federal and federally assisted actions for which state review is provided by federal law, regulation, or policy; and

(iii)  proposed federal regulations and policies pertaining to natural resource issues; and

(b)  in the development and implementation of a procedure that will expedite the review of proposed energy and industrial facilities that require permits to be issued by more than one state agency.

(2)  The state planning coordinator shall review and forward the comments and recommendations of the committee to:

(a)  the governor;

(b)  the initiating state agency, in the case of a proposed state action; and

(c)  the Office of Legislative Research and General Counsel.



Renumbered and Amended by Chapter 382, 2008 General Session

